Hawaii statutes.
§201H-75 Trustee; designation, duties.
(a) The corporation may designate a trustee for each issue of bonds secured
under the same trust indenture; provided that the trustee shall be approved by
the director of finance.

(b) The trustee shall be authorized by the
corporation to receive and receipt for, hold, and administer the proceeds of
the bonds, and to apply the proceeds to the purposes for which the bonds are
issued.

(c) The trustee shall also be authorized by
the corporation to hold and administer any housing project bond revolving funds
and housing loan program revenue bond revolving funds established pursuant to
section 201H-80. The trustee may receive and receipt for, hold, and administer
the revenues derived by the corporation from any housing project or projects or
loan program for which the bonds are issued or the projects or loan programs
pledged to the payment of the bonds. The trustee shall apply the revenues to
the payment of the cost of administering, operating, and maintaining the housing
project or projects or loan program; to pay the principal of and the interest
on the bonds; to the establishment of reserves; and to other purposes as may be
authorized in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(d) Notwithstanding section 39-68, the
director of finance may appoint the trustee to serve as fiscal agent for:

(1) The payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds; and

(2) The purchase, registration, transfer, exchange,
and redemption of the bonds.

(e) The trustee shall perform additional
functions with respect to the payment, purchase, registration, transfer,
exchange, and redemption, as the director of finance may deem necessary,
advisable, or expeditious, including the holding of the bonds and coupons, if any,
that have been paid and the supervision of their destruction in accordance with
law.

(f) Nothing in this part shall limit or be
construed to limit the powers granted to the director of finance in sections 36‑3,
39-13, and 39-68(a), to appoint the trustee or others as fiscal agents, paying
agents, and registrars for the bonds or to authorize and empower those fiscal
agents, paying agents, and registrars to perform the functions referred to in
those sections. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2015, c 237, §15]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next